Maryland, session 2026, SB0072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
13–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore County.
13–1104.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IF THE BOARD HAS ADOPTED
REGULATIONS TO AUTHORIZE THE SALE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR
OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
– 1 –

Ch. 816 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) IN CONSIDERING WHETHER TO ADOPT REGULATIONS UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL CONSIDER THE PUBLIC HEALTH IMPACTS OF THE SALE
OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A CLASS B OR CLASS D
LICENSE THAT AUTHORIZES THE SALE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR
ON–PREMISES AND OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION AT A RESTAURANT OR BAR.
(2) A LICENSE HOLDER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY OBTAIN A
PERMIT FROM THE BOARD THAT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO SELL, IF
AUTHORIZED UNDER THE HOLDER’S LICENSE, MIXED DRINKS OR COCKTAILS IN
SEALED OR CLOSED CONTAINERS FOR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION IF:
(I) THE MIXED DRINK OR COCKTAIL IS PURCHASED ALONG
WITH PREPARED FOOD OTHER THAN PREPACKAGED SNACKS;
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL PURCHASING THE MIXED DRINK OR
COCKTAIL:
1. IS AT LEAST 21 YEARS OLD; AND
2. PROVIDES VALID IDENTIFICATION AS PROOF OF AGE;
AND
(III) EACH MIXED DRINK OR COCKTAIL SOLD FOR OFF–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION IS:
1. PROVIDED IN THE MANUFACTURER’S ORIGINAL
SEALED CONTAINER OR IN A CONTAINER CLOSED WITH A CAP, CORK, SEAL, OR LID
WITH NO HOLES FOR STRAWS OR SIPPING; AND
2. SOLD NOT LATER THAN 11 P.M.
(C) THE BOARD:
(1) MAY NOT CHARGE A LICENSE HOLDER AN ADDITIONAL FEE FOR
SELLING ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION; AND
(2) MAY LIMIT THE QUANTITY OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES THAT MAY
BE SOLD UNDER THIS SECTION TO AN INDIVIDUAL IN A SINGLE TRANSACTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 816
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –